Utah statutes.
35A-4-304.   Special provisions regarding transfers of unemployment
experience and assignment rates.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Knowingly" means having actual knowledge of or acting with deliberate
ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved.
(b)  "Person" has the meaning given that term by Section 7701(a)(1) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
(c)  "Trade or business" includes the employer's workforce.
(d)  "Violate or attempt to violate" includes intent to evade,
misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure.
(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Subsections (3) and
(4) shall apply regarding assignment of rates and transfers of unemployment
experience.
(3) (a)  If an employer transfers its trade or business, or a portion of its
trade or business, to another employer and, at the time of the transfer, there
is common ownership, management, or control of the employers, then the
unemployment experience attributable to each employer shall be combined into a
common experience rate calculation.
(b)  The contribution rates of the employers shall be recalculated and made
effective upon the date of the transfer of trade or business as determined by
division rule in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act.
(c) (i)  If one or more of the employers is a qualified employer at the time
of the transfer, then all employing units that are party to a transfer
described in Subsection (3)(a) of this section shall be assigned an overall
contribution rate under Subsection 35A-4-303(4)(d), using combined
unemployment experience rating factors, for the rate year during which the
transfer occurred and for the subsequent three rate years.
(ii)  If none of the employing units is a qualified employer at the time of
the transfer, then all employing units that are party to the transfer
described in Subsection (3)(a) shall be assigned the highest overall
contribution rate applicable at the time of the transfer to any employer who
is party to the acquisition for the rate year during which the transfer
occurred and for subsequent rate years until the time when one or more of the
employing units is a qualified employer.
(iii)  Once one or more employing units described in Subsection (3)(c)(ii) is
a qualified employer, all the employing units shall be assigned an overall
rate under Subsection 35A-4-303(4)(d), using combined unemployment experience
rating factors for subsequent rate years, not to exceed three years following
the year of the transfer.
(d)  The transfer of some or all of an employer's workforce to another
employer shall be considered a transfer of its trade or business when, as the
result of the transfer, the transferring employer no longer performs trade or
business with respect to the transferred workforce, and the trade or business
is now performed by the employer to whom the workforce is transferred.
(4) (a)  Whenever a person is not an employer under this chapter at the time
it acquires the trade or business of an employer, the unemployment experience
of the acquired business shall not be transferred to that person if the
division finds that the person acquired the business solely or primarily for
the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions.
(b)  The person shall be assigned the applicable new employer rate under
Subsection 35A-4-303(5).
(c)  In determining whether the business was acquired solely or primarily for
the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions, the division shall use
objective factors which may include:
(i)  the cost of acquiring the business;
(ii)  whether the person continued the business enterprise of the acquired
business;
(iii)  how long the business enterprise was continued; or
(iv)  whether a substantial number of new employees were hired for performance
of duties unrelated to the business activity conducted prior to acquisition.
(5) (a)  If a person knowingly violates or attempts to violate Subsection (3)
or (4) or any other provision of this chapter related to determining the
assignment of a contribution rate, or if a person knowingly advises another
person in a way that results in a violation of any of those subsections or
provisions, the person is subject to the following penalties:
(i) (A)  If the person is an employer, then the employer shall be assigned an
overall contribution rate of 5.4% for the rate year during which the violation
or attempted violation occurred and for the subsequent rate year.
(B)  If the person's business is already at 5.4% for any year, or if the
amount of increase in the person's rate would be less than 2% for that year,
then a penalty surcharge of contributions of 2% of taxable wages shall be
imposed for the rate year during which the violation or attempted violation
occurred and for the subsequent rate year.
(ii) (A)  If the person is not an employer, the person shall be subject to a
civil penalty of not more than $5,000.
(B)  The fine shall be deposited in the penalty and interest account
established under Section 35A-4-506.
(b) (i)  In addition to the penalty imposed by Subsection (5)(a), a violation
of this section may be prosecuted as unemployment insurance fraud.
(ii)  The determination of the degree of an offense shall be measured by the
total value of all contributions avoided or reduced or contributions sought to
be avoided or reduced by the unlawful conduct as applied to the degrees listed
under Subsection 76-8-1301(2)(a).
(6)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division shall make rules to identify the transfer or acquisition of
a business for purposes of this section.
(7)  This section shall be interpreted and applied in a manner that meets the
minimum requirements contained in any guidance or regulations issued by the
United States Department of Labor.
